Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA MUSEUM OF AMERICAN ART.new text end new text begin $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Minnesota Museum of American Art in St. Paul to promote the creation of exhibitions and programs and provide open access to education and community programs with Minnesota artists. new text end